District of Columbia statutes.
38-922

Free textbooks, maps, and supplies.

The Board shall provide the pupils of the senior high schools, free of charge, with the use of all aeronautical textbooks, maps, and other necessary educational supplies required for said course.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 807, ch. 585, § 3
1981 Ed., § 31-903.
1973 Ed., § 31-1203.